Maine, session 132, LD995.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA §3214, sub-§2, as amended by PL 2023, c. 201, §1; c. 230,
§2; c. 306, §§2 and 3; and c. 361, §§3 to 5, is further amended by enacting at the end a new
last blocked paragraph to read:
As used in this subsection, "low-income household" means a household with income of no
more than 150% of the federal poverty level, as defined in Title 22, section 3762, subsection
1, paragraph C.
Sec. 2. Appropriations and allocations. The following appropriations and
allocations are made.
HOUSING AUTHORITY, MAINE STATE
Low-income Home Energy Assistance - MSHA 0708
Initiative: Provides one-time funds in fiscal year 2025-26 and fiscal year 2026-27 only for
low-income electric ratepayer assistance.
GENERAL FUND 2025-26 2026-27
All Other $7,500,000 $7,500,000
__________ __________
GENERAL FUND TOTAL $7,500,000 $7,500,000